Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 16
RECORD OF BRANDS ON SLAUGHTERED CATTLE

Sec.

§ 25-1601. Record of slaughtered cattle — Penalty for violation.

Any persons engaged in the business of slaughtering cattle, must keep at their place of business a book in which they must enter daily the number and class of cattle slaughtered, the name of the person or persons from whom said cattle were purchased, and the marks and brands of such cattle. Said book must be kept ready at all times for the inspection of any person who may desire to examine the same. Any person violating the provisions hereof shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

1876, p. 36, § 1; am. R.S., § 1195; reen. R.C. & C.L., § 1255; C.S., § 1947; I.C.A.,§ 24-1301; am. 1941, ch. 51, § 1, p. 109.